Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska26-120.01
Arrest; military protective order; notification, when required.

When a peace officer arrests any person who is a member of the armed forces of the United States, the officer shall determine whether a military protective order registered in the Federal Bureau of Investigation's National Crime Information Center database has been issued against such person. If the peace officer has probable cause to believe that such person has violated such military protective order, the peace officer shall notify the appropriate authority that issued such order.

Laws 2026, LB753, § 4.
July 18, 2026